Missouri, session 2026, HB1910.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 454, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 454.1050, to read as follows:
454.1050. 1. This section shall be known and may be cited as "Bentley and
Mason's Law".
2. If a person is convicted of the offense of driving while intoxicated, such offense
caused the death of a parent or parents of a child or children, and a surviving parent or
guardian files a petition to receive child maintenance from the person convicted of such
offense, such person may be ordered by the court to pay child maintenance to the child
or children until the child or children:
(1) Die;
(2) Marry;
(3) Enter active military duty;
(4) Reach eighteen years of age unless the provisions of subsection 3 of this
section apply; or
(5) Reach twenty-one years of age unless the provisions of the maintenance order
specifically extend beyond the child's or children's twenty-first birthdays for reasons
provided under subdivision (1) of subsection 3 of this section.
3. (1) If the child or children are physically or mentally incapacitated from
supporting themselves and insolvent and unmarried, the court may extend the
maintenance obligation past the child's or children's eighteenth birthday.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 1910 2
(2) (a) If the child or children reach eighteen years of age and are enrolled in
and attending a secondary school program of instruction, maintenance may continue, if
the child or children continue to attend and progress toward completion of such
program, until the child or children complete such program or reach twenty-one years
of age, whichever first occurs.
(b) If the child or children are enrolled in an institution of vocational or higher
education no later than October first following graduation from a secondary school or
completion of a graduation equivalence degree program and so long as the child or
children enroll for and complete at least twelve hours of credit each semester, not
including the summer semester, at an institution of vocational or higher education and
achieve grades sufficient to reenroll at such institution, maintenance may continue until
the child or children complete their education or until the child or children reach
twenty-one years of age, whichever first occurs. To remain eligible for such continued
maintenance, at the beginning of each semester the child or children shall submit to the
court a transcript or similar official document provided by the institution of vocational
or higher education that includes the courses the child or children are enrolled in and
have completed for each term, the grades and credits received for each such course, and
an official document from the institution listing the courses that the child or children are
enrolled in for the upcoming term and the number of credits for each such course.
When enrolled in at least twelve credit hours, if the child or children receive failing
grades in half or more of the child's or children's courseload in any one semester,
payment of maintenance for the child or children receiving the failing grades may be
terminated and shall not be eligible for reinstatement. Upon request for notification of
the child's or children's grades by the court, the child or children shall produce the
required documents to the court within thirty days of receipt of grades from the
education institution. If the child or children fail to produce the required documents,
payment of maintenance may terminate without the accrual of any maintenance
arrearage and shall not be eligible for reinstatement. If the circumstances of the child or
children manifestly dictate, the court may waive the October first deadline for
enrollment required by this subdivision. As used in this subdivision, "institution of
vocational education" means any postsecondary training or schooling for which the
child is assessed a fee and attends classes regularly. "Higher education" means any
community college, college, or university at which the child attends classes regularly. A
child or children who have been diagnosed with a developmental disability, as defined
under section 630.005, or whose physical disability or diagnosed health problem limits
the child's or children's ability to carry the number of credit hours prescribed in this
subdivision, shall remain eligible for maintenance so long as such child or children are

HCS HB 1910 3
enrolled in and attending an institution of vocational or higher education and the child
or children continue to meet the other requirements of this subdivision. A child or
children who are employed at least fifteen hours per week during the semester may take
as few as nine credit hours per semester and remain eligible for maintenance so long as
all other requirements of this subdivision are complied with.
4. The court may order the person convicted of the offense of driving while
intoxicated as provided under subsection 2 of this section to pay maintenance in an
amount that is reasonable or necessary for the maintenance of the child or children after
considering all relevant factors, including:
(1) The financial needs and resources of the child or children;
(2) The financial resources and needs of the surviving parent or, if no other
parent is alive or capable of caring for the child or children, the guardian of the child or
children, including the state if the state is the guardian;
(3) The standard of living the child or children would have enjoyed;
(4) The physical and emotional condition of the child or children and the child's
or children's educational needs;
(5) The child's or children's physical and legal custody arrangements; and
(6) The reasonable work-related child care expenses of the surviving parent or
guardian.
5. In addition to the relevant factors listed under subsection 4 of this section, the
court may consider the guidelines set out under subsection 8 of section 452.340 and
Missouri Supreme Court Civil Procedure Rule Form 14 in determining the amount
reasonable or necessary for the maintenance of the child or children.
6. (1) The court may order that child maintenance payments be made to the
circuit clerk as trustee for remittance to the surviving parent or guardian entitled to
receive the payments. The circuit clerk shall remit such payments to the surviving
parent or guardian within three working days of receipt by the circuit clerk. Circuit
clerks shall deposit all receipts no later than the next working day after receipt.
(2) As an alternative to subdivision (1) of this subsection, the court may, upon its
own motion, order that maintenance payments be made to the family support payment
center established under section 454.530 as trustee for remittance to the surviving
parent or guardian. However, the court shall not order payments to be made to the
payment center if the family support division notifies the court that such payments shall
not be made to the center. In such cases, payments shall be made to the clerk as trustee
until the division notifies the court that payments shall be directed to the payment
center.

HCS HB 1910 4
7. In addition to any other remedy provided by law for the enforcement of child
maintenance, if a maintenance order has been entered, the director of the family
support division or the director's designee shall issue an order directing any employer or
other payer of the person required to pay child maintenance under this section to
withhold and pay over to the family support division or the clerk of the circuit court in
the county in which a trusteeship is or will be established moneys due or to become due
to the surviving parent or guardian for the child or children in an amount not to exceed
federal wage garnishment limitations.
100 8. If a person ordered to pay child maintenance under this section is
101 incarcerated and unable to pay the required maintenance, the person shall have up to
102 one year after the release from incarceration to begin payment, including any arrearage.
103 If any obligation under this section is to terminate as provided under subsection 2 of this
104 section but the person's obligation is not paid in full, payments shall continue until the
105 entire arrearage is paid.
106 9. (1) If the surviving parent or guardian of the child or children brings a civil
107 action against the person convicted of driving while intoxicated prior to any child
108 maintenance order under this section and the surviving parent or guardian obtains a
109 judgment in his or her favor in the civil suit, no maintenance shall be ordered under this
110 section.
111 (2) If the court orders child maintenance under this section but the surviving
112 parent or guardian brings a civil action and obtains a judgment in his or her favor, the
113 child maintenance order shall offset the judgment awarded in the civil action.
114 10. The provisions of any order respecting maintenance under this section may
115 be modified only upon a showing of changed circumstances so substantial and
116 continuing as to make the terms unreasonable.
✔